arb-verbs-lexc.txt
{v@xabaz-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خبز^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xabuv-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خبث^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xab~aO_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خبأ^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xab~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خبر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xada$-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خدش^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaDab-i_1@0}:^ss^خضب^se^		Transitive;
{v@xAdaE_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خادع^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaD~-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خض^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaD~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خضر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xafaq-iu_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خفق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xafat-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خفت^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xafaY-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خفى^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xafiy-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خفي^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xajil-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خجل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xAl-a_1@0}:^ss^خال^se^		Transitive;
{v@xalab-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خلب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xalad-u_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^خلد^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@xAlaS_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خالص^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xAlaT_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خالط^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaloxal_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خلخل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xal~ad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خلد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xal~aY_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خلى^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xAl~_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خال^se^@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xamad-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خمد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xamal-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خمل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xAmar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خامر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xam~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xam~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خمن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xam~as_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خمس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xanaE-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خنع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xAnaq_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خانق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xAr-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خار^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xarab-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خرب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaram-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خرم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaraS-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خرص^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaraT-ui_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خرط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaris-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خرس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xaroba$_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خربش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xarobaT_1@0}:^ss^خربط^se^		Transitive;
{v@xar~-iu_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xar~ab_1@0}:^ss^خرب^se^		Transitive;
{v@xaSab-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خصب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xaSaf-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خصف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xasaf-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خسف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xasaf-i_2@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خسف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaSam-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خصم^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xASam_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خاصم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xasi}-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خسئ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xas~-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xaS~ab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خصب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xAT-i_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^خاط^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@xaTA-u_1@0}:^ss^خطا^se^		Transitive;
{v@xatan-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ختن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaTar-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خطر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xaTar-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خطر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xATar_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^خاطر^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@xaTi}-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خطئ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaTur-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خطر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaT~aO_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^خطأ^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@xaT~aY_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خطى^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaw~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خوف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaw~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خون^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaw~ax_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^خوخ^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@xay~ab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خيب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xay~al_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خيل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xay~ar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خير^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xay~aT_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خيط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@xaz~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^خز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@xaz~an_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^خزن^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@yabis-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^يبس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@yab~as_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^يبس^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@yam~am_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^يمم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@yam~an_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^يمن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@yatim-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^يتم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@yatum-u_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^يتم^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@zaOar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زأر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zab~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زبل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaEaq-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زعق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zaEil-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زعل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zaE~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زعل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaf~-i_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زف^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaf~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaf~at_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زفت^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zAg-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زاغ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zAg-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زاغ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zagorad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زغرد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zahad-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زهد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaHaf-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زحف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zahaq-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زهق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@ZAhar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ظاهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaHozaH_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زحزح^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zajar-u_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زجر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zakA-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زكا^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zakam-a_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زكم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zal~-ia_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@Zal~al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^ظلل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zAmal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زامل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zamojar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زمجر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@Zam~aO_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ظمأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zAn-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زان^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zanojar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زنجر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@zan~-u_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaqozaq_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زقزق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaq~-u_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زق^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zAwaj_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زاوج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zAwal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زاول^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zawaY-i_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زوى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaw~aj_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زوج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zaw~aq_1@0}:^ss^زوق^se^		Transitive;
{v@zaxoraf_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زخرف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zAyad_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زايد^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zay~af_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^زيف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zay~an_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^زين^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@zay~at_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^زيت^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@{i$omaOaz~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اشمأز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{i$otam~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اشتم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{i$otAq_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^اشتاق^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@{i$otaq~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اشتق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{i$otaT~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اشتط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ibota*al_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^ابتذل^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ibotadar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ابتدر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ibotaEav_1@0}:^ss^ابتعث^se^		Transitive;
{v@{ibotahaj_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ابتهج^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ibotahal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ابتهل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ibotasar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ابتسر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ibotaz~_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^ابتز^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iboyaD~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ابيض^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{idoham~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ادهم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{idolaham~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^ادلهم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iDomaHal~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اضمحل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iDoTajaE_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اضطجع^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iDoTarab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اضطرب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iEotA$_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتاش^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iEotadal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتدل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iEotamal_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتمل^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iEotamar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتمر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iEotanaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتنى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iEotaSar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتصر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iEotawar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتور^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iEotaz~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اعتز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iEowaj~_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^اعوج^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@{ifotaOat_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افتأت^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ifotaDaH_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افتضح^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ifotadaY_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^افتدى^se^@D.V.P@		Transitive;
{v@{ifotakar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افتكر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ifotaraq_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افترق^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ifotaras_1@0}:^ss^افترس^se^		Transitive;
{v@{ifotaraY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افترى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ifotatan_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افتتن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ifotAt_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افتات^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ifotaxar_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^افتخر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{igotabaT_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^اغتبط^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@{igotAb_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اغتاب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{igotarab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اغترب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{igotaraf_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اغترف^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{igotar~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اغتر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{igotasal_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^اغتسل^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHomar~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احمر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iHotaDar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^احتضر^se^@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ihotadaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اهتدى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotajan_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتجن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iHotajar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^احتجر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iHotak~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتك^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotalam_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتلم^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iHotAl_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^احتال^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iHotaqan_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتقن^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotaqar_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^احتقر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ihotaraO_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اهترأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotarab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احترب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotaras_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احترس^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotaraz_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^احترز^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotAr_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتار^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotasaY_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتسى^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{iHotaTab_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتطب^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHotAT_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^احتاط^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{iHowal~_1@0}@D.V.P@:^ss^احول^se^@D.V.P@		Intransitive;
{v@{ijotanab_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^اجتنب^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ijotaraO_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اجترأ^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
{v@{ijotaraH_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^اجترح^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ijotar~_1@0}@D.M.I@:^ss^اجتر^se^@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ijotaz~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اجتز^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Transitive;
{v@{ikofahar~_1@0}@D.V.P@@D.M.I@:^ss^اكفهر^se^@D.V.P@@D.M.I@		Intransitive;
